Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 1 General Provisions

37-3-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

(.1)
“Available outpatient treatment” means outpatient treatment, either public or private, available in the patient’s community, including but not limited to supervision and support of the patient by family, friends, or other
responsible persons in that community. Outpatient treatment at state expense shall be available only within the limits of state funds specifically appropriated therefor.

“Chief medical officer” means the physician with overall responsibility for patient treatment at any facility receiving patients under this chapter or a physician appointed in writing as the designee of such chief medical officer.

“Clinical record” means a written record pertaining to an individual patient and shall include all medical records, progress notes, charts, admission and discharge data, and all other information which is recorded by a facility or other entities responsible
for a patient’s care and treatment under this chapter and which pertains to the patient’s hospitalization and treatment. Such other information as may be required by rules and regulations of the board shall also be included.

“Community mental health center” means an organized program for the care and treatment of the mentally ill operated by a community service board or other appropriate public provider.

“Court” means:

In the case of an individual who is 17 years of age or older, the probate court of the county of residence of the patient or the county in which such patient is found. Notwithstanding Code Section 15-9-13, in any case in which the judge of such court
is unable to hear a case brought under this chapter within the time required for such hearing or is unavailable to issue the order specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 37-3-41, such judge shall appoint a person to
serve and exercise all the jurisdiction of the probate court in such case. Any person so appointed shall be a member of the State Bar of Georgia and shall be otherwise qualified for his duties by training and experience.
Such appointment may be made on a case-by-case basis or by making a standing appointment of one or more persons. Any person receiving such standing appointment shall serve at the pleasure of the judge making the appointment
or his successor in office to hear such cases if and when necessary. The compensation of a person so appointed shall be as agreed upon by the judge who makes the appointment and the person appointed with the approval of
the governing authority of the county for which such person is appointed and shall be paid from the county funds of said county. All fees collected for the services of such appointed person shall be paid into the general
funds of the county served; or

In the case of an individual who is under the age of 17 years, the juvenile court of the county of residence of the patient or the county in which such patient is found.

“Emergency receiving facility” means a facility designated by the department to receive patients under emergency conditions as provided in Part 1 of Article 3 of this chapter.

“Evaluating facility” means a facility designated by the department to receive patients for psychiatric evaluation as provided in Part 2 of Article 3 of this chapter.

“Facility” means any state owned or state operated hospital, community mental health center, or other facility utilized for the diagnosis, care, treatment, or hospitalization of persons who are mentally ill; any facility operated or utilized for such
purpose by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or other federal agency; and any other hospital or facility within the State of Georgia approved for such purpose by the department.

“Full and fair hearing” or “hearing” means a proceeding before a hearing examiner under Code Section 37-3-83 or Code Section 37-3-93 or before a court as defined in paragraph (4) of this Code section. The hearing may be held in a regular courtroom or
in an informal setting, in the discretion of the hearing examiner or the court, but the hearing shall be recorded electronically or by a qualified court reporter. The patient shall be provided with effective assistance of counsel.
If the patient cannot afford counsel, the court shall appoint counsel for him or the hearing examiner shall have the court appoint such counsel; provided, however, that the patient shall have the right to refuse in writing the
appointment of counsel, in the discretion of the hearing examiner or the court. The patient shall have the right to confront and cross-examine witnesses and to offer evidence. The patient shall have the right to subpoena witnesses
and to require testimony before the hearing examiner or in court in person or by deposition from any physician upon whose evaluation the decision of the hearing examiner or the court may rest. The patient shall have the right to
obtain a continuance for any reasonable time for good cause shown. The hearing examiner and the court shall apply the rules of evidence applicable in civil cases. The burden of proof shall be upon the party seeking treatment of
the patient. The standard of proof shall be by clear and convincing evidence. At the request of the patient, the public may be excluded from the hearing. The patient may waive his right to be present at the hearing, in the discretion
of the hearing examiner or the court. The reason for the action of the court or hearing examiner in excluding the public or permitting the hearing to proceed in the patient’s absence shall be reflected in the record.

“Individualized service plan” means a proposal developed during a patient’s stay in a facility and which is specifically tailored to the individual patient’s treatment needs. Each plan shall clearly include the following:

A statement of treatment goals or objectives, based upon and related to a proper evaluation, which can be reasonably achieved within a designated time interval;

Treatment methods and procedures to be used to obtain these goals, which methods and procedures are related to these goals and which include a specific prognosis for achieving these goals;

Identification of the types of professional personnel who will carry out the treatment and procedures, including appropriate medical or other professional involvement by a physician or other health professional properly qualified to fulfill legal requirements
mandated under state and federal law;

Documentation of patient involvement and, if applicable, the patient’s accordance with the service plan; and

A statement attesting that the chief medical officer has made a reasonable effort to meet the plan’s individualized treatment goals in the least restrictive environment possible closest to the patient’s home community.

Who presents a substantial risk of imminent harm to that person or others, as manifested by either recent overt acts or recent expressed threats of violence which present a probability of physical injury to that person or other persons; or

Who is so unable to care for that person’s own physical health and safety as to create an imminently life-endangering crisis; and

Who is in need of involuntary inpatient treatment.

(9.1)
“Inpatient” means a person who is mentally ill and:

(9.2)
“Inpatient treatment” or “hospitalization” means a program of treatment for mental illness within a hospital facility setting.

(9.3)
“Involuntary treatment” means inpatient or outpatient treatment which a patient is required to obtain pursuant to this chapter.

“Least restrictive alternative,” “least restrictive environment,” or “least restrictive appropriate care and treatment” means that which is the least restrictive available alternative, environment, or care and treatment, respectively, within the limits
of state funds specifically appropriated therefor.

Reserved.

“Mentally ill person requiring involuntary treatment” means a mentally ill person who is an inpatient or an outpatient.

(12.1)
“Outpatient” means a person who is mentally ill and:

(12.2)
“Outpatient treatment” means a program of treatment for mental illness outside a hospital facility setting which includes, without being limited to, medication and prescription monitoring, individual or group therapy,
day or partial programming activities, case management services, and other services to alleviate or treat the patient’s mental illness so as to maintain the patient’s semi-independent functioning and to prevent the patient’s
becoming an inpatient.

Who is capable of surviving safely in the community with available resources or supervision from family, friends, or others;

Who, based on their psychiatric condition or history, is in need of treatment in order to prevent further disability or deterioration that would predictably result in dangerousness to self or others; and

Whose current mental status or the nature of their illness limits or negates their ability to make an informed decision to seek voluntarily or to comply with recommended treatment.

“Patient” means any mentally ill person who seeks treatment under this chapter or any person for whom such treatment is sought.

“Private facility” means any hospital facility that is a proprietary hospital or a hospital operated by a nonprofit corporation or association approved for the purposes of this chapter, as provided herein, or any hospital facility operated by a hospital
authority created pursuant to the “Hospital Authorities Law,” Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 31.

(14.1)
“Psychologist” means a licensed psychologist who meets the criteria of training and experience as a health service provider psychologist as provided in Code Section 31-7-162.

“Representatives” means the persons appointed as provided in Code Section 37-3-147 to receive notice of the proceedings for voluntary or involuntary treatment.

“Superintendent” means the chief administrative officer who has overall management responsibility at any facility receiving patients under this chapter, other than a regional state hospital or state owned or operated community program, or an individual
appointed as the designee of such superintendent.

(16.1)
“Traumatic brain injury” means a traumatic insult to the brain and its related parts resulting in organic damage thereto which may cause physical, intellectual, emotional, social, or vocational changes in a person.
It shall also be recognized that a person having a traumatic brain injury may have organic damage or physical or social disorders, but for the purposes of this chapter, traumatic brain injury shall not be considered mental
illness.

“Treatment” means care, diagnostic and therapeutic services, including the administration of drugs, and any other service for the treatment of an individual.

“Treatment facility” means a facility designated by the department to receive patients for psychiatric treatment as provided in Code Sections 37-3-80 through 37-3-84.

History.
Ga. L. 1958, p. 697, § 1; Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-501, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 723, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37; Ga.
L. 1986, p. 1098, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1566, § 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 8; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 17.1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, §§ 1-9, 1-10; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-12/HB 228;
Ga. L. 2010, p. 286, § 8/SB 244; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 3-2/HB 1013.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, rewrote subparagraphs (12.1)(A) through (12.1)(C) which read: “(A) Who is not an inpatient but who, based on the person's treatment history or current mental status, will require outpatient treatment
in order to avoid predictably and imminently becoming an inpatient;

“(B) Who because of the person's current mental status, mental history, or nature of the person's mental illness is unable voluntarily to seek or comply with outpatient treatment; and

“(C) Who is in need of involuntary treatment.”

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, the paragraph (11) designation, which was inadvertently stricken by the 2009 amendment, was added.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

Law reviews.

For comment, “1986 Amendments to Georgia’s Mental Health Statutes: The Latest Attempt to Provide a Solution to the Problem of the Chronically Mentally Ill,” see 36 Emory L.J. 1313 (1987).

For note, “The Parity Cure: Solving Unequal Treatment of Mental Illness Health Insurance Through Federal Legislation,” see 44 Ga. L. Rev. 511 (2010).

37-3-2.
Authority of board to issue regulations; powers of department generally.

The board shall issue regulations to implement this chapter in accordance with the intent of this chapter to safeguard the rights of the mentally ill, as set forth in Code Sections 37-3-100, 37-3-101, and 37-3-120, and Article 6 of this chapter.

In addition to the other powers provided by this chapter, the department shall have the authority:

To enforce the regulations issued by the board;

To prescribe the forms of applications, records, medical certificates, and any other forms required or used under this chapter and the information required to be contained therein;

To require such reports from any facility as it may find necessary to the performance of its duties or functions;

To visit facilities regularly to review the hospitalization procedures applied to all patients;

To determine the care and treatment being given all patients;

To investigate complaints and make reports and recommendations relative to the same; and

To make effective such procedures and orders as may be appropriate to carry out this chapter.

Notwithstanding the powers granted to the department under this Code section, the requirements of this Code section as to determination of treatment and care of patients and the investigation of complaints shall not apply to patients hospitalized in an
institution operated by or under the control of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other federal agency.

History.
Ga. L. 1877, p. 113, §§ 1, 2, 4; Code 1882, §§ 1344b, 1344c, 1344e; Civil Code 1895, §§ 1412, 1413, 1415; Civil Code 1910, §§ 1574, 1575, 1577, 1595; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 41; Code 1933, §§ 35-202, 35-203, 35-205; Ga. L.
1958, p. 697, § 21; Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 19; Code 1933, § 88-519, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-508.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-507.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L.
1990, p. 45, § 1.

37-3-3.
Validity of hospitalization orders entered before September 1, 1978; establishment of regulations as to orders authorizing continued hospitalization of patients hospitalized before September 1, 1978.

No hospitalization of a mentally ill person lawful before September 1, 1978, shall be deemed unlawful because of the enactment of this chapter. The board is authorized to establish reasonable regulations to require that the chief medical officer of each
treatment facility apply under Code Section 37-3-83 for an order authorizing continued hospitalization of any patient for whom such hospitalization is necessary and who was initially hospitalized under an order of a court prior to
September 1, 1978. Such prior orders of hospitalization entered by the courts, unless superseded at an earlier date by an order under this chapter or unless such prior orders expire under their own terms at an earlier date, shall remain
valid until March 1, 1979, after which all such orders shall be null and void and of no effect.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-508.7, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-507.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1.

37-3-4.
Immunity from liability for actions taken in good faith compliance with admission and discharge provisions of chapter; immunity not applicable to failure to meet standard of care in provision of treatment.

Any hospital or any physician, psychologist, peace officer, attorney, or health official, or any hospital official, agent, or other person employed by a private hospital or at a facility operated by the state, by a political subdivision of the state,
or by a hospital authority created pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 31, who acts in good faith in compliance with the transport, admission, and discharge provisions of this chapter shall be immune from civil or criminal
liability for his or her actions in connection with the transport of a patient to a physician or facility, the admission of a patient to a facility, or the discharge of a patient from a facility; provided, however, that nothing in
this Code section shall be construed to relieve any hospital or any physician, psychologist, peace officer, attorney, or health official, or any hospital official, agent, or other person employed by a private hospital or at a facility
operated by the state, by a political subdivision of the state, or by a hospital authority created pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 31, from liability for failing to meet the applicable standard of care in the provision
of treatment to a patient. The immunity from civil liability provided in this Code section in connection with the transport of a patient to a physician or a facility shall apply only to injury or damages incurred by such patient or
his or her personal representative.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-502.18, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.23, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 996, § 3; Ga. L. 2011, p. 346, § 2/HB 343; Ga. L. 2022, p. 722, § 3/SB 403.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, substituted “transport, admission, and discharge” for “admission and discharge”, inserted “the transport of a patient to a physician or facility,”, substituted “facility, or the discharge” for “facility
or the discharge”, and added the second sentence.

Cross references.

Liability of law enforcement officers for actions taken at scene of emergency, §

35-1-7

.

Employment and training of peace officers, T. 35, C. 8.

Physicians generally, T. 43, C. 34.

Psychologists generally, T. 43, C. 39.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 722, § 1/SB 403, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Behavioral Health and Peace Officer Co-Responder Act.’”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 722, § 2/SB 403, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that:

“(1) Demands on peace officers include responding to emergencies involving individuals with a mental or emotional illness, developmental disability, or addictive disease, without the benefit of a behavioral health specialist being present;

“(2) The presence of a behavioral health specialist exponentially decreases the risk of escalation;

“(3) The absence of a behavioral health specialist may result in the arrest of individuals whose conduct would be more effectively treated and stabilized in a behavioral health setting rather than a jail or prison;

“(4) Law enforcement agencies throughout Georgia frequently report that jails and prisons are becoming revolving door behavioral health hospitals of last resort;

“(5) Several law enforcement agencies in Georgia have established co-responder programs and formed co-responder partnerships with local community service boards. Community service boards provide support during emergency responses and provide follow-up
services to help stabilize the individual in crisis and prevent relapse;

“(6) Combining the expertise of peace officers and behavioral health specialists to de-escalate behavioral health crises prevents unnecessary incarceration of individuals with a mental or emotional illness, developmental disability, or addictive disease
and instead links those in crisis to services that promote stability and reduce the likelihood of recurrence, decreases the costs incurred by prisons and jails to incarcerate such individuals, and increases the ability of peace officers
outside of the co-responder teams to focus on serious crimes; and

“(7) It is in the best interest of the state to establish the framework for a state-wide co-responder model to include emergency response co-responder teams and post-emergency behavioral health services.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law on trial practice and procedure, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 339 (2010).

37-3-5.
Apprehension by peace officer of patient who leaves facility without permission.

If, during the period of involuntary hospitalization pursuant to any valid physician’s certificate, court order, or order by the hearing examiner authorized by this chapter, a patient escapes or otherwise leaves a facility without permission, the facility
may advise any peace officer that the patient has escaped or otherwise left the facility without permission; and the peace officer shall be authorized to take the patient into custody and return him to such facility.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-507.9, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 723, § 10.

37-3-6.
Approval of private facilities as emergency receiving, evaluating, or treatment facility; powers and duties of private facilities; right to deny admission.

Any private facility within this state may be approved as an emergency receiving facility, an evaluating facility, or a treatment facility by the department at the request of or with the consent of the governing officers of such private facility. When
so approved, the private facility shall have all powers given to the corresponding type of state owned or state operated facility under the provisions of this chapter on voluntary admission, emergency admission, admission for evaluation,
and involuntary hospitalization and shall have all duties and obligations of such facilities imposed by this chapter, except that any such private facility may decline to accept any patient who is unable to pay it for hospitalization
or for whom it has no available space.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-508.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-507.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1.

37-3-7.
Abandoning or leaving patients on grounds of psychiatric hospital.

Any person who abandons or leaves any patient on the grounds of any state owned or state operated psychiatric hospital without the permission of the regional state hospital administrator of the hospital commits the offense of criminal trespass.

History.
Ga. L. 1918, p. 274, § 1; Code 1933, § 35-9901; Code 1933, § 88-2715, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-18.

Cross references.

Penalty for criminal trespass, §

16-7-21

.

37-3-8.
Loitering or trespassing on grounds of psychiatric hospital.

Any person who loiters about or trespasses on the property of any state owned or state operated psychiatric hospital or drives or rides over the grounds or roads of such hospital property with horses, automobiles, bicycles, motorcycles, or other vehicles,
except in accordance with such rules and regulations as may be posted under the authority of the board, commits the offense of criminal trespass.

History.
Ga. L. 1918, p. 274, § 1; Code 1933, § 35-9902; Code 1933, § 88-2716, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

Cross references.

Penalty for criminal trespass, §

16-7-21

.